Maine, session 132, LD1524.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §741, as amended by PL 2013, c. 146, §§9 to 12, is further
amended to read:
§741. Governor's powers
1. Control during emergencies. In the event of disaster beyond local control, the
Governor may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency
management and public safety functions within the State.
2. Cooperation. In performing the duties required by this chapter, the Governor shall,
directly or through the commissioner, cooperate with all departments and agencies of the
Federal Government, with the offices and agencies of other states and foreign countries and
their political subdivisions and with private agencies in all matters pertaining to the
emergency management capability of the State and of the Nation.
3. Authority. In performing the duties required by this chapter, the Governor, in direct
consultation with the Legislative Council, may:
A. Make, amend and rescind the necessary orders and rules to carry out this chapter
within the limits of the authority conferred upon the Governor and not inconsistent with
the rules, regulations and directives of the President of the United States or of any
federal department or agency having specifically authorized emergency management
or homeland security functions;
B. Prepare a comprehensive plan and program for the emergency management
functions of this State. That plan and program must be integrated into and coordinated
with the emergency management plans of federal agencies and with the plans of other
states and foreign countries, and their political subdivisions, to the fullest possible
extent;
C. Coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management
functions by the political subdivisions of the State. These plans must be integrated into
and coordinated with the emergency management plan and program of the State to the
fullest possible extent;
D. In accordance with the plan and program for the emergency management functions
of the State, and consistent with the emergency management and homeland security
plans, programs and directives of the Federal Government, procure supplies and
equipment, institute training programs and public information programs and take all
other preparatory steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency
management organizations in advance of actual disaster or catastrophe, to ensure the
furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management
personnel in time of need;
E. Conduct studies and surveys and take inventories of the industries, resources and
facilities of the State necessary to ascertain the State's emergency management
capabilities, and plan for their most efficient emergency use, including emergency
economic controls to ensure adequate production and equitable distribution of essential
commodities;
F. Whenever a shortage of critical material supplies appears imminent in the State,
establish emergency reserves of those products necessary to ensure the health, welfare
Page 1 - 132LR0342(01)

414 and safety of the people of the State. To establish those reserves, the Governor may
425 purchase quantities of those materials for resale on a cost plus expenses basis for
436 priority end users within the State;
G. On behalf of the State, enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and
foreign countries, and their political subdivisions, and coordinate mutual aid plans
between political subdivisions of the State. If an arrangement is entered into with a
jurisdiction that has enacted the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, chapter
16, or the International Emergency Management Assistance Compact, chapter 16‑A,
any resulting agreement or agreements may be considered supplemental agreements
pursuant to those compacts. If the other jurisdiction or jurisdictions with which the
Governor proposes to cooperate have not enacted one of those compacts, the Governor
may negotiate special agreements with the jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Any
agreement, if sufficient authority for its making does not otherwise exist, becomes
effective only after approval by the Legislature;
G-1. Establish and ensure maintenance of a primary facility designated as the State
Emergency Operations Center from which the emergency coordination of response to
and recovery from a disaster may be effectively carried out and ensure the identification
of an alternate site that may be used for this purpose if necessary; and
H. Delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this chapter and provide for
the subdelegation of that authority.
In carrying out the duties of this section, the Governor shall narrowly tailor the
Governor's actions to address the public health or safety emergency to which the actions
are directed while limiting the extent to which the actions deviate from the actions that
would be permissible in the absence of a declared emergency.
The Superior Court has jurisdiction over cases brought by individuals adversely
affected by actions taken pursuant to this section and shall determine in such matters
whether the Governor’s actions are sufficiently narrowly tailored. Pursuant to the Maine
Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 65, the court may provide for a temporary restraining order
or preliminary injunction in those cases. If a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction is issued against the Governor's action or actions pursuant to this section, an
appeal by the Governor of the order or injunction to the Supreme Judicial Court must be
expedited.
Sec. 2. 37-B MRSA §742, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 28, Pt. C, §1, is
further amended to read:
1. Emergency proclamation. Emergency proclamations must be issued as follows.
A. Whenever a disaster or civil emergency exists or appears imminent, the Governor
shall, by oral proclamation, declare a state of emergency in the State or any section of
the State. If the Governor is temporarily absent from the State or is otherwise
unavailable, the next person in the State who would act as Governor if the office of the
Governor were vacant may, by oral proclamation, declare the fact that a civil
emergency exists or appears sufficiently imminent to activate emergency plans in any
or all areas of the State. A written copy of the proclamation must be filed with the
Secretary of State within 24 hours of the oral proclamation.
Page 2 - 132LR0342(01)

B. Subject at all times to the further direction and order of the Governor, an executive
proclamation of emergency activates the emergency plans applicable to the affected
areas and is the authority for the deployment and use of any forces or resources to
which the plan or plans apply.
C. After the filing of the emergency proclamation and in addition to any other powers
conferred by law, the Governor, in direct consultation with the Legislative Council,
may:
(1) Suspend the enforcement of any statute prescribing the procedures for conduct
of state business, or the orders or rules of any state agency, if strict compliance
with the provisions of the statute, order or rule would in any way prevent, hinder
or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency;
(2) Utilize all available resources of the State Government and of each political
subdivision of the State as reasonably necessary to cope with the disaster
emergency;
(3) Transfer the direction, personnel or functions of state departments and
agencies, or units thereof, for the purposes of performing or facilitating emergency
services;
(4) Authorize the obtaining and acquisition of property, supplies and materials
pursuant to section 821;
(5) Enlist the aid of any person to assist in the effort to control, put out or end the
emergency or aid in the caring for the safety of persons;
(6) Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any
stricken or threatened area within the State, if the Governor determines this action
necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitigation, response or
recovery;
(7) Prescribe routes, modes of transportation and destinations in connection with
evacuations;
(8) Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement of persons
within the area and the occupancy of premises therein;
(9) Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing or transportation of alcoholic beverages,
explosives and combustibles;
(10) Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing;
(11) Order the termination, temporary or permanent, of any process, operation,
machine or device which may be causing or is understood to be the cause of the
state of emergency for which this proclamation was made;
(12) Take whatever action is necessary to abate, clean up or mitigate whatever
danger may exist within the affected area; and
(13) During a state of emergency declared by the Governor in accordance with
this section due to the outbreak of COVID-19:
(a) Reasonably adjust time frames and deadlines imposed by law for state,
county and municipal governments and other entities when such an adjustment
is reasonably necessary to mitigate an effect of the emergency;
Page 3 - 132LR0342(01)

(b) In consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, suspend the
termination of residential electricity and water services during the period of
emergency and up to 60 days after the state of emergency is terminated; and
(c) Modify or suspend the requirements for professional or occupational
licensing or registration by any agency, board or commission if strict
compliance with such requirements would in any way prevent, hinder or delay
necessary action in dealing with the emergency.
The powers granted in divisions (a) and (c) terminate 30 days following the
termination of the state of emergency.
E. In dealing with a declared state of emergency under this subsection, the Governor
shall ensure that:
(1) Medical privacy and confidentiality requirements, including but not limited to
requirements under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, are followed; and
(2) Health care services and surgeries are not considered to be nonessential
services.
F. The Governor, during the pendency of a state of emergency, may not without
approval of the Legislature reissue or renew an emergency proclamation, issue another
emergency proclamation that is substantially similar to one that expired or reissue an
emergency proclamation terminated by the Legislature.
G. The Governor, during the pendency of a state of emergency, shall provide a detailed
written weekly briefing to the Legislative Council. At a minimum, the briefing must
detail all actions taken pursuant to this section and, with respect to such actions, must
detail how and whether the actions have been successful in abating the public health or
safety emergency. Compliance with this section does not by itself satisfy the
Governor's obligations to directly consult the Legislative Council when acting pursuant
to this section, when applicable.
Sec. 3. 37-B MRSA §743, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 594, §34, is amended
to read:
2. Limitation. No As long as each House of the Legislature is able to assemble either
in person or remotely as authorized by a joint order passed by the Legislature, a state of
emergency may not continue for longer than 30 days unless it is renewed by the Governor
a 3/5 vote of each House of the Legislature. If either House of the Legislature is unable to
assemble within 30 days, that House of the Legislature shall take a renewal vote as soon as
practicable. If the state of emergency is not renewed following a vote by the Legislature,
the Governor shall issue an executive proclamation ending the state of emergency within
24 hours of the vote not renewing the state of emergency. The Legislature, by joint
resolution, may terminate a state of emergency at anytime any time by the vote of a majority
of each House of the Legislature. Thereupon, the The Governor shall then issue an
executive proclamation ending the state of emergency.